
                   Horrible professor.  Worthless lectures, unclear instructions, boring, and seemingly out to make the whole class fail.  The average on his first test was a 55% before he curved it!
                
                   Nice Guy. But to be honest, if I didn't have to take him since hes the only one that taught 3312, I definitely would of chosen someone different.  Easily my least favorite professor in the CIDM department.  But people learn in different ways, and his teaching style is not how I learn.
                
                   Good guy but not the best at teaching.
                
                   Dr. Alex is a very good teacher who knows his stuff when it comes to Java/C++.  I highly recommend him.
                
                   Awesome prof. Usually teaches to lowest common demoninator, which is most of the class.
                
                   One of the only few good computer science/CIS professors in WTAMU. He lectures are not boring and are in-topic. He is helpful with homework.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher I learned a lot about Java from him
                
                   A VERY good teacher. If you want to learn Java/C++ programming then this is the teacher to take. If you have problems then he is always avaliable for help. His test are some what easy but you will still learn .
                
                   She should have never been let go.  Dr Abdullat run her off.
                
                   Carlson's got the charisma of a dead animal. If I had had a rock big enough to finish the job, I would have killed myself in her class.
                
                   Satan's warming up a seat. Joan Carlson should have more respect for the institution of higher learning by never stepping on a college campus.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   A very good teacher but Dr. Abdullat ran her off. :(
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class is so hard! I would not recommend to take. Final is extremely hard and it counts 40% of the grade.  Horrible experience ever!
                
                   This  class was incredibly difficult and frustrating. The recorded lectures weren't effective for my learning style. I hired tutors, asked my engineer friends for help, and basically drove myself crazy while taking this class. I worked harder than I have ever worked on a subject and still don't think I understand it.
                
                   This class taken online was horrible. The hardest class I have ever taken. I barely passed. And I'll take it because i don't ever want to take this class again. 
                
                   Only restates his pod casts. Offers nothing to help students learn a different way.  He knows  his stuff but I had no success asking questions, he merely sends you to the book.  I took this online.  I would not recommend a e-book or taking this online.
                
                   Don't take this online. He doesn't explain anything. He doesn't show you how to get the answers. Basically he doesn't actually teach the material.
                
                   This professor does not explain ANYTHING!!
                
                   I hate stats, but his online class wasn't that bad.  The group work really helped with the assignments (and there were plenty of assignments), and the tests were tough but most passed.
                
                   Great teacher of stats. Better do your homework though because it is not easy and you will have to study unless you are some kind of math wiz.
                
                   Dr. Kelley is so great! He isn't going to hold your hand, you do have to do your homework, come to class and ask questions...and if you do this, you will know exactly what you are doing at the end of the semester. He never seems agitated with questions, or repeating himself. My favorite teacher!
                
                   Great teacher, very helpful. Smart guy, he is tough but fair.
                
                   A very good teacher. I would retake QBA 250 with him again. Was a good Department Head too.. hint hint
                
                   He is a good professor. I learn a lot. However, he grades kinda picky. He marks a lot of points even for partial credit.
                
                   DONT DO IT
                
                   He cant teach. He gives you a pop quiz but then 10 seconds later says its over and if it not turned in by the time he gets to your row you dont get a grade. Another problem with his pop quiz is he does not tell you what to do on it.
                
                   He really is a terrible teacher. Although, the COB doesn't have any good stats teachers so I guess he's you're best bet. If you turn in your homework, you'll pass.
                
                   Made statistics easy to understand using real world examples.
                
                   this is a great class.  If you want to be able to get a good grade in statistics, this is the course.  You do have to work at it though.
                
                   He's a very caring and nice teacher.  Really helpful.  At first you think the class is going to be really hard, but he makes it pretty easy.  He makes some forgetful mistakes but is self-deprecating and funny.  If you attend all classes, it's a pretty easy A.
                
                   Very helpful and friendly professor.  He will stop and explain anything to you.  He teaches mostly from his own personal knowledge.  His tests match what he has shown you in class.  They are hard, but passable if you listen closely
                
                   The Best he got a raw deal when they retired him.
                
                   Your average teach nothing really special here. Project as kind of annoying
                
                   May have lots of knowledge of the subject but is a very bad teacher.  Course was very hard to keep up with or even figure out what needed to be done and when.  When missing a class, he has no idea what was covered the day before, his only answer is I don't know look at the website and see if you can see anything you missed.  DO NOT TAKE HIM!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I'm taking this online.  I've taken a lot online, but I am so lost in this class. The directions are unclear and the class is way hard!
                
                   Took an online course. I don't want to but it is the only one that can fit my schedule. It is very hard to understand him by his emails and syllabus. For example, I just figure it what he meant an &quot;unit test&quot; was after several months in the class. He had another word for it &quot;chapter practice test.&quot; Be consistent or you will confuse students!
                
                   I thought the class I took with him was not taught very well... I was always confused and frustrated with the format of the class.
                
                   Relys alot on old school programs and search tools , all the work he gives you is like its just his class and your not in another one, rambles a whole lot about meaningless info..
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Trys to keep up with changing tech but the school has to spend the money.  Easy to go to for help and know a lot of hardware stuff.  He always likes to learn stuff from the students.  It is a changing field and alot to know.
                
                   A could be wrong, but his knowledge on computers seems some what limited. He knows older machines like the 8086, 386 and 486. But his current computer tech knowledge is lacking a lot. Who uses Novel Networks any more or token ring. Legacy applications is
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Another good teach that is gone. :(
                
                   great teacher, highly reccommend
                
                   Fabulous
                
                   Jeremy is a sweetheart!!! TAKE HIS CLASS!!!!
                
                   Jeremy is really nice!
                
                   Bulldog.
                
                   Dr. Tang is very difficult to understand. Be prepared to teach yourself.  He doesn't post his class notes until just before tests. His tests  often have nothing to do with what you went over in class and are sometimes strangely worded.
                
                   Amjad is a great guy and willing to grant extensions and make up work. Write him a lot of emails and stop by his office as much as possible. Ask for the extra credit.
                
                   One of the worst classes I have taken (I have A in all eight class I took so far, except this class). Very poor communication, not clear on requirement, and very hard grader. I never enjoyed his class, and in fact, I can gain  better knowledge reading a book on my own. My advice, select other classes instead if possible. 
                
                   Confusing as hell. No direction, questions on the test did not originate from the book or lectures or power points. If u have to take this guy take test with a group, get a group that is good for the project. Type in questions in Google to search for answers. He's horrible do not take him.
                
                   Everyone is doing horrible in this class-He assigned us a 100 question and only 10% of the chapters that we were assigned to read and study were on that test. He didn't even check to see if the questions were associated with what we had to study. If u want a professor who does not care about his students and will fail u-then he is the one.
                
                   This guys is terrible, five very long reports with no direction-a 150 questions test that surprised all students because nothing that we were forced to read was on test (average test score 60%) Group are frusterated with each other because they don't know what to do and don't quite understand what part of the group wants to do-Jut don't take him.
                
                   So I am currently taking this professor. I am having a hard time. He gives no direction and I really trying to survive this class-anyone have any advice for me to survive this class-what he expects.
                
                   So I am doing horrible in this class- Any tips on how he likes the papers, reviews written (format) and his test-are they based on the actual chapters, notes etc.
                
                   He is very hard to understand, sucks at teaching, and sucks at grading! Fun teacher, but damn, he just plains sucks. I barely passed Database...
                
                   This guy is a crock! always giving HW without directions, only Verbal instructions, and when it's time to turn it in, NOBODY did it right, because he adds stuff! Hard to understand, can't read his writing, This guy is absolutely worthless....do whatever you can to avoid him....Worst Department head EVER!!! doesnt even use computer grade systems....
                
                   Not good at teaching. I recommend taking this course somewhere else and transferring the credit, especially if you are interested in course subject or want to actually learn something.
                
                   Agree with most on here, not good, or helpful.  Very rude and clearly hates teaching!
                
                   no comment
                
                   Too bad to say something
                
                   Most useless professor I have ever had.  He know nothing about computers.
                
                   This is the most lying dishonest person I have every meet.
                
                   The worst professor I have ever had.  This is the worst experience of my life.
                
                   Very confusing and not helpful at all.
                
                   Nice guy, Class is sortof useless.
                
                   Hard to understand english. Just reads power point presentation. Add assignments not on syl.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I would not have graduated if not for Dr. Childs. He is blunt but he is a kind man and really helped me out by counseling etc. when I was in a tight spot. I owe my career and my trade to him
                
                   If you have no or very little experience in programming, DO NOT TAKE Child's class. He is extremely unclear and starts off from nowhere every class. He can't put things together and make them easy to understand. Gives out extremely hard tests with ambiguous problems on them. DO NOT TAKE THIS CLASS unless you are ready to self-study a lot.
                
                   ok professor
                
                   Easy class if you follow directions and syllabus TO THE LETTER!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   In all fairness, Bart Childs can't teach his way out of a paper bag in the classroom.  However, one-on-one, he is great.  Take him for an independent study.   Grad students swear that he has moved mountains for them to help them graduate.
                
                   He's a good professor and he helps you if you go to him. He encourages you to work in team so you can get a glimpse of how this field is in the real world.
                
                   Jory really cares about his students and wants everyone to pass.  However, he will not just hand out grades, you have to work for them.  He curves most of his tests especially if he sees that most of the students struggled on them and curves the entire class at the end of the class.  As long as you do your your work, you will pass.
                
                   Best professor I've ever had. He really cares about his students and wants you to pass. Lots of homework though, with a quiz in lecture and lab every week. As long as you do the work and try, you're good. Curved the final grade by 8 points. About half the class made A's. 
                
                   Overall, Denny is a pretty good professor. He's a very tough grader, but is more than available if there's something you have a question about. Lectures are interesting and cover most of the content that you need to know, but the book a good outside resource.
                
                   This person really sucks. I hate his english accent, the person does not spend time on preparing for his class. He didn't prepare so he had to joke around and tell stories to student to waste out the time. Never take his class, take the other professor's 314. The person simply doesn't know how to teach.
                
                   Great teacher. Teaches a dense subject that requires attention to detail and and in depth understanding of the subject. Come interview time though you better know this stuff, they will quiz you on this topic. It is after all the bread and butter of CS. He is very very approachable and will help you out of class even on HW problems :)
                
                   One of the hardest classes I ever took
                
                   She isn't very helpful in office hours. 
                
                   Great teacher, learned so much. Very nice, understanding and supportive.
                
                   
                
                   I would not recommend this professor.  He seems to be better suited to teach non-mathematical and non-algorithmic clases.
                
                   Hard to follow her lectures, but Dr. Lee is really sweet and wants her students to learn. With additional help and reading outside of class, it's possible to make an A or B.
                
                   Horrible, way too much work for a class like this. Assignments very difficult, and grades very tough. Tests are not too bad, but make sure you go to her office hours. She does give points back only if she likes you. I guess she didn't like me too much because some students went from failing to an A and I went from failing to a D.
                
                   Dr. Leyk is a tough professor, but if you go to her office hours for help she will work with you to make sure you learn the material. Also, if you go over the test with her and show her you understand the material she will give points back on the test.
                
                   I cannot understand one word that she says. I basically had to teach myself using her slides and it was so frustrating I wanted to scream. She's very nice and willing to give you grade help, but if you can't string together one intelligible English sentence what are you doing teaching in English?
                
                   She is impossible to understand, and doesn't understand when students ask questions, so she ends up confusing everybody more. Her lectures are unstructured, and communication of the logistics of assignments and projects is poor. It is possible to get a good grade, but you most likely won't actually learn anything.
                
                   Thick accent, but very focused on helping students learn. Lots of work for the class but this course is the basis for so many other CSCE classes that it is very important to learn the material. Very approachable outside of class.
                
                   Dr. Leyk is a nice lady, but her lectures are absolutely awful and she doesn't understand that we are taking more classes than just hers. The workload is insane but she sometimes delays due dates if enough people are dying. The class sucks overall though, and her bad lectures on important and sometimes confusing material make it worse.
                
                   This class is taught somewhat poorly. The work load for this course is IMMENSE and many people cheat. No one really knows solid answers, and you pretty much have to bs your way through the course. Leyk is nice, but lectures have NO structure and are mostly useless and incomprehensible. Tests are confusing, but representative to some degree.
                
                   Poor grasp of the English language. Assignments are mostly integrating the obscure lecture notes into an algorithm. Unethical grader and will increase your grade if you attend office hours.
                
                   It is impossible to understand her and she has just as much trouble understanding you, so don't bother asking questions, it will only get MORE confusing. You have to create multiple usernames and passwords and her and the TA did a terrible job of explaining how to go about getting started in lab. There are multiple assignments due each week
                
                   She is a very helpful prof who picks on people sitting on the front row.  She is more than willing to bump your grade up if you go to her office hours.
                
                   Knows her stuff but has a thick accent. If you go talk to her after tests she will give you back most of your missed points.
                
                   Most helpful. She really wants her students to learn.
                
                   I still don't understand what she's saying.
                
                   Very boring lectures.  Unclear about assignment specs.  She is extremely nice and gives alot of extra credit.  She will even help you during a test sometimes.  You will probably get a good grade in her class, but probably won't learn very much.
                
                   Is very helpful if you make the effort to see her outside of class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Does not know how to vocalize. Difficult to understand his English. Does not respond emails, sometimes in purpose. Very desorganized. Long assignments due very nearby dates, even on finals week.  
                
                   Very vague
                
                   Professor is like every research faculty: doesn't give a damn about the lecture, so he can get back to the lab sooner. For 14th of the semester, he was advertising his study abroad trip. Everything was disconnected, nothing cohesive. I really liked the subject matter, but he was making sure that we failed. Labs covered only 20% of the lectures.
                
                   Rabi is a passionate professor who cares about his students and their work.
                
                   Not worth time attending anything this guy teaches. Zero knowledge of subject, heavy accent. Unfit to be a prof. This guy is ruining the life of students. I lost complete interest in Embedded systems after attending his class
                
                   Is this guy still teaching&#63; That's crime against the American education system!
                
                   Another boring guy. He should definitely not teach. Not only he does not know the subject, but he also has very strong accent and this makes him incomprehensible. He is pretending to &quot;teach&quot; something/anything.
                
                   Another boring guy. He should definitely not teach. Not only he does not know the subject, but he also has very strong accent and this makes him incomprehensible. He is pretending to &quot;teach&quot; something/anything.
                
                   If this guy is a professor, then I'm an astronaut. He made me lose all my interest in embedded systems.
                
                   He is impossible to understand. He is not competent to teach any course in Computer Science. His class was waste of time. He brings some slides to courses, projects them on the wall and talks to himself. The rest are just sleeping.
                
                   pretty good teacher, hes fairly hard to understand, but he definitely will help you out if you go talk to him
                
                   Moore is a decent professor, he cares about the topic and is wiling to answer any questions you have. In class coding can get pretty hard. Most initial learning goes on outside of class so make sure you read every night because it's very easy to get behind. Tests are not easy but manageable, most of the questions are conceptual and not too specific
                
                   Moore is a decent professor, he cares about the topic and is wiling to answer any questions you have. A lot of the learning goes on outside of class so make sure you read every night because it is very easy to get behind. Tests are not easy but manageable, most of the questions are conceptual and not too specific
                
                   Difficult tests, Group project is killer hard. Lab work is  a completion grade, and homeworks though challenging help you learn the material.
                
                   Take him, you'll be forced to learn a lot. Harder than other TAMU professors but you get a good workload that teaches you good CS skills.
                
                   He has a class of philosophy on the class and his lecture. I admire his knowledge and way of teach. Also he really cares about his students. Great researcher and great professor.  - sjs -
                
                   Dr P. was the greatest advisor who ever lived.
                
                   Never really told us when things were due. That caused lots of frustration. But you could email him and he usually responded quickly. Expected a lot out of us without teaching it. MATLAB and LabView are hard... we never got lessons on them but were basically expected to be experts on how to program. Good curve at the end, but would not recommend.
                
                   ENGR 111 is supposed to be a rough class and Dr. Ritchey forces you to learn with lots of work (most of it is incorporated in all the classes, but it's enforced here). You have to put your time in and you'll learn your stuff. C'mon this is HNRS. Tough tests, but mass curves. I know for a fact (using excel spdsheet) 78 AVG was an A for a friend.
                
                   He isn't a good professor, and I did not enjoy his class.  The class is intensely frustrating, and Dr. Ritchey was no help at all.  He rarely answers questions, only offering vague explanations that don't help at all.  Assignments are very unclear and ambiguous.  There is a lot of very hard (programming) hw; he enjoys our pain, seriously.
                
                   Dr. Ritchey assigns Readiness Assessment Tests (RATs) for nearly every class. Many complain about his "pop quizzes," but all of the material you need to know for the RATs is on the syllabus. Expect to make 70s on the RATs, and still do great in the class. He demonstrates with examples and works with you if you have questions. Quick at emailing.
                
                   The course itself is confusing and has a lot of work, regardless of the professor. He is very helpful and extremely responsive to questions. 
                
                   He's great because he knows everything. After a while his super mind-powers of Matlab & Labview somehow are absorbed into your mind through osmosis and then bam! You're wondering why you were ever scared about miserable failing the class. He also picks the best TA's who love to tell stories about engineering rockstars. There's no better ENGR PROF!!
                
                   Dr. Ritchey is the hardest professor you will ever have. His class goes faster than any other CSCE 222 class and he covers chapters others don't cover. He will only go over the math of what you are doing and assume you know why you are doing the math (and therefore can apply the math in any situation). The homework takes forever to do. STAY AWAY
                
                   Unless you can read his mind, this class will be one of the hardest things ever.
                
                   Good professor, always ready to help. Teaches the concepts in a easy to understand way :)Tests aren't too hard.
                
                   Very tough, teaches at graduate-level.  Assigns grades based on the class average.  Very helpful outside of class.
                
                   not recommend, difficult to understand. He will not grade you based on the syllabus and you will have no idea.
                
                   This professor was amazing. He really took time to make sure that all of his students understood the material. It was a very enlightening class.
                
                   Most awesome professor ever. Keeps the interest level high all the time in the class. Source of motivation for the students. Hard working.
                
                   He was really no help in class.  Interesting, brilliant, good guy, but he can't, and shouldn't, teach an introductory course, EVER.
                
                   HE'S SMART AS CRAP AND ITS AWESOME TO BE IN HIS CLASS...buT I ALMOST FAILED
                
                   Great professor, It's clear he cares about doing a good job teaching. Would go out of my way to take classes taught by him. The projects were very challenging but supposedly that's getting revised for future semesters.  No accent to worry about.
                
                   CSCE222 is difficult, and he doesn't make it much easier. He expects us to do our homework in LaTex, which isn't too hard, except that some homeworks require you to put graphs in your homework, which is a hassle to teach yourself how to do. Also, pop quizzes are 15% of the grade, so go to class if you want a decent grade.
                
                   2 Tests and a final. They aren't ridiculous, but there was a lot of ambiguity in some questions. Homework is weekly and done in LaTex, which sucks, but you get used to it. The class is pretty confusing at times and reading your textbook becomes required at times to understand. I recommend chegg study to help your understanding when you're stuck.
                
                   Very knowledgable about the material being covered. Her programming assignments would sometimes require multiple visits to the TA or her office.
                
                   Dr. Williams makes programming in Python an extremely interesting and enjoyable experience. She is very funny when she wants to be, but is serious when it comes to getting things done. Only bad thing to say is she gets really irritated if you use your phone in class, and will call you out on it if you even look away from her when she's speaking.
                
                   She's a great professor. She's very patient with students, and responds quickly to emails. She grades fairly and gives good reviews for all of the midterms and the final. It's a hard, time-intensive course, but if you do everything she asks, and go to class, you can make a good grade. 
                
                   Doesn't know course well. Didn't know answers to questions students asked.
                
                   He is really helpful.
                
                   Very knowledgeable. He updates his class notes every year. Very helpful.
                
                   Very efficient. The way he utilize the technology, website, and the way he teaches: very unique. Very knowledgable!
                
                   He is helpful, sarcastic.. His classes are great fun.  Forgets time limits... A's are his favorite grade.. At the end of the day, he wants you to learn some good thing out of his course.
                
                   Can be intimidating but breaks everything down for you and is very helpful during one-on-ones. No doubt one of the best cpsc profs. I took every course I could with him and made As.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great professor, if you like to work independently. He is encourage to become better. You can make this class easy or hard. Choose your own project and work on it.
                
                   he is a very sweet person and he tries to help but he also over complicates things that are not complicate.  if you want to actually learn programming basics, then pls dont take this class! ms. sandy hertuer teaches this class better than anybody else! she will make you fall in love with programming!
                
                   He teaches almost of technologies during his class. Just taking class without absent can help your assignments,quizzes, and exams. Also, you can get lots of help if you ask a question in his office time.
                
                   He's a really sweet elderly man. His lectures aren't hard to follow. Sometimes it's difficult to stay awake. He's really nice and will help you in any way he can! You can learn a lot in this class if you don't sit back and play video games.
                
                   This instructor is THE WORST one I have had at TAMU-C.  Tests do not align with what he attempts to teach in class.  He never has time to tutor, he is just collecting a check, he doesn't help you when you ask a question.  Looks at you as if you a stupid when you don't understand.  He is a pitiful instructor.  DO NOT TAKE HIM!!
                
                   Bad teacher. His lectures are very unclear simply because he is more of a mumbler than a teacher. His homework's require you to decrypt them. So much jargon that he doesn't teach you and he is never willing to help you. He is always &quot;too busy&quot; to answer your questions and refers you to the tutors. Worst teacher I have had at commerce.
                
                   This guy is an awful teacher. His lectures are unclear and so are his instructions. You will miss many questions just because you don't understand what he is asking for. You make one small mistake and we will count off an entire point when the rubric is out of 10.
                
                   This teacher is a jerk when it comes to asking a question. He does not like when you ask questions and he counts off on the smallest error. He accuse before getting all the facts. He is old school.
                
                   Tom Brown cares about his students and tries very hard.  His classes are a bit too easy, but considering the other CSCI instructors (and the class of student that attends this college), I'd consider him the best.  He does have a sense of the real world and one can actually use what is learned in his classes.
                
                   Even though Dr. Brown is not the best conversationalist, he is willing to help anyone.
                
                   Very nice teacher, soft spoken, and thorough. He basically does most of the labs for you through examples, all you have to do is change a few words. Quizes were all vocabulary and a pain in the butt, they were the only thing I didn't make a hundred on.
                
                   Very nice guy. He is very introverted and softspoken, but really knows his stuff. Easy classif you attend and listen.
                
                   he is very boring, very slow, queries from the db alot, instead of teaching the material.  very short with students wanting help.  the advanced is the SAME COURSE, exremely disappointing.  95% teach themselves, cheat, and do programs for one another. sad.
                
                   This teacher will teach you Database and SQL Commands to use with Orcal. Not the Funnest class and alot of terms but not bad at all!
                
                   This guy is the most boring and unclear professor of my entire college carrier. He freaks out if you ask questions or visit his office. One of my least liked professors ever. I really had to teach myself.
                
                   I gave a near perfect score because as a class its easy and Brown is very helpful and will answer any questions you have.  However it can get boring, and tedious as he tends to repeat everything over and over and over. I still learned some cool SQL stuff.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class should be renamed from Data Management to watch the instructor get data from a database.  It would be nice if he taught Database Management and database concepts besides showed how to do SQL queries.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He realy knows about his stuff very well. He doesn't teach alot though. Very easy to make an A in his class.
                
                   The best professor I have ever met!
                
                   Dr. Creider will have you doing a lot of work outside of class.  His tests will be quite long depending on your programming skills / aptitude.  Very good instructor.  The extra work pays off!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I've had this instructor for more then one class. If you can take classes under any other instructor I suggest highly to do so.
                
                   He doesn't teach. Anyone can buy a book and read it, and taking one quiz a week isn't going to teach anyone anything. There is no lecture that has to do with the course-work, and for a computer science course, he takes off 15-25 points for APA format. Doesn't really make sense, and it is clear that the education system has outgrown him. 
                
                   Fairly easy class if you do the work and do it properly. There are weekly quizzes which require you to type a detailed responses to multiple questions, which does take some time. The biggest problem I faced with the course was maintaining interest in the course and actually doing the work.
                
                   Rating the class rather than the professor. A "quiz" every week which is 2 essay questions about something in the text can be done in 1hr. Midterm is hard.; over PP notes - you can copy them all into word and cntrl+F the exam question, but not all slides will load in eCollege. 5pg paper 20% grade. Final is like midterm but easier. 710 pretty easy
                
                   Do not take this class!!!
                
                   Makes class harder then needs to be.
                
                   He doesn't help at all, he will not help you with the programs, he assumes that you know everything, no notes to hand out  or to even write, all of his "notes" online are from Sandra Sandy Huerter,  so confusing hard to understand and in all honesty he is the worse professor do not take this class take unless you want to fail.
                
                   Best professor ever. Made the I think about computer science and algorithms.
                
                   Expectations were very clear. Dr. Creider's online set up was extremely organized and well paced for a summer course. He answered questions promptly. Great professor!
                
                   Man extemely difficult if you never tooken C++, plus he goes by his own notes in his head. So it makes it hard to study for what is going to be on quizzes and tests
                
                   He teaches like he expects you to know the material after he states it once. It was clear he didn't want to teach undergrads. I had people helping me in upper levels with the homework that couldn't write out the programs to his standard. If you understand programing & do it for a living or fun he'd probably be ok.  Otherwise, good luck.
                
                   I learned many things here. Great professor. we can learn many things from professor in academics and in personal
                
                   You have to know some C++ before taking this class.  If you know some basic C++ going in, then you will learn a ton in this class.  The workload is huge, and if you don't know C++ going in, you will have to work twice as hard.  I learned a ton in this class, and if you can handle this class, you can handle working as a programmer.
                
                   he is extremely difficult to handle
                
                   Good
                
                   Ph.D is in experimental psychology. Only has Masters degree in Computer Science. Teaches graduate level classes.  Should not be allowed to teach above undergraduate level because not qualified.  Intimidates students and is not qualified to teach the subject matter.
                
                   Has no teaching skills; intimidates instead of teaching; excessive course workload
                
                   Has no teaching skills.  Intimidates instead of teaching.
                
                   I thought classes were pretty simple and practical. You get what you ut into it. Progesor knows a bunch os stuff and helps those who pay attention and do their work.
                
                   When 50% of the class fails, it is then a problem with the professor and not the students!!!Who does or wants C programming these days&#63; Why can't he teach C++ with OOPs concepts&#63; How about web-based database applications&#63;&#63;&#63;&#63;Does he
                
                   Dr. Harter gives suitable assignments to learn the material, and expects the students to work.  He gives helpful comments on program assignments, and was flexible in the class schedule, adjusting assignments where appropriate.  I learned a great deal, and believe I'm prepared for the next course.
                
                   What can I say, He spent the first part of the semester reviewing 151 stuff when we all knew it.  If you can take it with any other teacher DO IT.  He had us do programs that were written by another 152 professor and he couldn't or wouldn't help us with them.
                
                   Isn't entirely clear, needs to be asked specific questions for you to completely understand, but that's part of a computer science course.  May need to ask the same question in various ways in order to get the answer you want/need.
                
                   Made us play &quot;catch up&quot; at the end of the semester and assigned lots of things for us to do.
                
                   Probably the worst teacher I have ever had. Wanted to sleep through every class and he was not helpful at all with the 6 programming assignments he made us do. If you can look for another Prof who teaches the class.
                
                   She is the best proffesor i have ever had! Her lectures are super clear and absolutly amazing. She is pretty funny and an amazing teacher all around. She uses eCollege as if she invented it.
                
                   She's a very sweet lady, & is very open to help after class. She has every resource you could ever need on ecollege. I never took my textbook out of its package. Lectures are really slow and hard to pay attention to, but you get credit for every class you attend. She drops the lowest quiz grade, and has almost identical practice quizzes online.
                
                   Overall an easy class, but the tone is a bit dry at times..(at all times)
                
                   Her lectures were boring but everything in the course was easy. She gives extra credit for showing up and she drops lower quiz grades. Her quizzes and tests are usually easy but sometimes the way she words the questions can become confusing. The midterm and half of the final were open note and she provides lots of study materials.
                
                   She knows the material but doesn't quite get the point across, and makes the course very uninteresting. She seems to also have quite a bit of trouble meeting deadlines and very rarely expects the students to do so either.
                
                   fair...
                
                   This teacher is beyond BORING! half the people don't show unless its a quiz day or they're asleep in class. She gives some time for programs and the quizzes seem to be diffcult for some, pretty easy if your able to stay awake in class. It takes her forever to grade programs, usually up to a month to grade one which is very frustrating
                
                   Overall a pretty good teacher. Lectures were somewhat boring but not as bad as some other profs. Tests were thorough and somewhat difficult. She gives lots of time to complete programming assignments. Hueter gives every opportunity to do well in this class.
                
                   Sandy bends over backwards to help her students.  Fantastic Guidance Counselor.  Like all other classes at what used to be known as &quot;Easy Texas State U&quot;, they are too easy and do not challenge the student.  She does the best she can with what she has.
                
                   She just LOVES reading directly from the projector screen...yay.
                
                   Very nice, very helpful, very boring.
                
                   Very easy
                
                   Pretty much reads the notes to you. But, that helps alot if your are a visual person.  Don't need to worry about taking notes because they are all print outs.  VERY helpful and works with students.  Great personality!
                
                   Overall, good teacher. Lectures can get pretty boring and monotone but to be fair its hard to make c++ interesting. But she is a very nice, fair person and that makes up for it.  She is also the hands-down best and most helpful degree counseler I ever had
                
                   he is THE worst professor I have seen in my life. I do not understand how does he teach in the grad scool of a university under A&amp;M system . he is  such a big ass just to know how to kiss ass to  departmental head and keep his job.
                
                   He is the worst guy in the dept. He talk all abt junk matters in his class. The irony is, he doesn't know programming but still shows off himself as a big time coder. He is fit to play some video games in a parlor.
                
                   His class is interesting.
                
                   does he teaches...he should be fired
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst professor in the entire department. Doesnt know what the hell he is talking about just stories. Very rude to international students and treats them like dirt. Never take his class not worth the tution fee.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   One of the worst professors ever I came across in my life.
                
                   The professor seems to be qualified for the job i.e. He worked in U.S Air force for 20 years and he proposed a lot of research papers and got them patented as well. But, One thing he doesn't realize is that he's a professor now and he needs to put some effort onto teaching students rather judging them if they're not working with military discipline
                
                   A
                
                   Will is an awesome professor. Very helpful. He really encourge independent research and study, so get ready to be creative in his class!
                
                   Liked this class. Will is nice and understanding. Re-explains concepts if someone doesn't understand. If class had trouble on an assignment, he goes over it again. Going to try to take next semester.
                
                   He has to be tha most borinest teacher i Have eva seen in my life
                
                   wow!  I love this class and I thought it woud be the worst
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome Teacher... Awesome class!!!
                
                   Boring & repetitve (but not helpful).  I changed my major because of him.
                
                   Great Teacher. Wish I had him for 152 instead of Harter. Makes CSCI easier to understand
                
                   Take him only if he likes you!  He will give you lot's of programming assignments and expects you to do them.  He really don't care if you learn or not!  He should be replaced!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   If your major is computer sci do not take class from this teacher. He will not prepare you for any other programming classes. If you want an easy class for 151 or 152 and comp sci is not your major then take the course from him.
                
                   He is a little boring, but he is very helpful and understanding. Take his class.
                
                   He is a great teacher who is very helpfull. Take his classes.
                
                   I would suggest taking classes from him.  He's a great teacher.
                
                   He is a very good and helpful teacher.
                
                   He is a very good and helpful teacher. If you have any problems in the course he will help you. He assigns a reasonable number of programs that will help you apply the material that was taught to you in class.
                
                   This professor really knows his stuff.  He explains the material in an easy to understand way.  His examples are very helpful.
                
                   This guy looks like he is in High school. Teaches like crap (Crap is bad)! Stay away from this horrible wannabe professor.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Gives plenty of helpful notes that the tests come straight from. If you do the homework and write down the parts of the notes she says will be on the test you'll do great.
                
                   Great teacher! Very clear in her lectures and an easy class as long as you show up for them.  She even helps out with schedules and teachers for the following semester. 
                
                   A very tough but fair teacher.  He is a good programmer, and it shows in his teaching.  Don't slack off - be on your toes at all times.  If you want to learn real-world programming techniques, latch on to this guy.
                
                   Cool!  Matt Trotter is a determined teacher.  He will do his best to make sure you understand the material.  You just have to be willing to try!!  Recommended!!
                
                   Very Good teacher. worth taking his class. But known to give &quot;C&quot; !!.
                
                   I was shocked to read all of the negative reviews about Ms. Binkerd! She is very friendly ans wants everyone to succeed but won't do it for you. She gives plenty of opportunities to make an A, but you definitely have to work for it.
                
                   THE WORST TEACHER. I hate her but she is the only one who teaches this required class for COSC majors. SUPER picky, stuck up, and all around bad. Only way to get a good grade is to spend dedicated your entire time to this class. Take at your own risk
                
                   She's not THAT bad if you do the work. All of the CS majors hate her because we're CS majors & not English majors, and this class just happens to be like English 1303 except more technically related. Just keep on top of your work, perhaps even get ahead, and this class is nothing to worry about at all. If all else fails, live in her office. Easy A.
                
                   Worst teacher ever. Always changes her mind about assignments;by the time I finish one I had to redo it.Sends emails 15 mins before class with new information and expects everyone to be ready.Extremely unclear about expectations.If she doesn't like you, you will not do well in her class.She will make you dread the day you registered for the class.
                
                   One of the worst teachers I have ever had and I've been to 3 colleges! She is very unclear with what she wants you to do and doesn't teach anything, she tells you to read the material in powerpoint and says that she didn't want to teach it. very un-professional with how she acts. Do not take this teacher she is horrible!!!
                
                   She's not that bad. Just make sure you ask questions in class and read the book. Don't just sit there with a blank face when you don't understand. ASK. Her labs are moderate compared to other classes but her tests can be wicked. Make sure you go to study groups and do the reviews and you should be fine.
                
                   better whip out that textbook and read from front to back because you'll learn nothing from her teachings
                
                   I thought Binkerd was a pretty good teacher. However, you don't want to take her class if you're not naturally skilled at programming. She often goes off on a tangent when it comes to CS-related opportunities, but at least it's informative. Her labs are sometimes unclear so it's important that you attend class to get instructions and clarification.
                
                   She is unclear when teaching, has a rude attitude, her assignments are unclear. This is a tough class to begin with, just plan on learning on your own time because it wont be from her.
                
                   THE WORST TEACHER EVER!! dont bother asking her a question/help cause she will simply tell u to go get tutoring on your own time.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   What a ****!!!
                
                   don't take her!
                
                   I can't even begin to describe how much I hate that women.
                
                   She is without-a-doubt the worst teacher (let alone programming teacher) that I've ever had. She just flat out sucks.
                
                   Horrible teaching style. Unclear on instructions. Dose not teach in an effective mannor and has horrible people skills.
                
                   aweful aweful aweful AWEFUL at teaching! She's also very rude and mean on top of that.
                
                   OMG I hate this lady, she is without a doubt the worst professor i have ever had the displeasure of taking.  Do not take this lady or you will live to regret it.  The only reason she still has a job is because she is an English major and will work for half the price of normal comp sci professors.
                
                   Worst prof I've ever had and I have 77 hours.  She's a big city yankee with no teaching skills, very rude behavior, and lazy.  I hate her.
                
                   What an idiot. An old dried up hippie who gets pissed is you dont call her DR. Give me a break.She doesnt explain things, she cant teach, good luck if you have a question, she tells you to ask a nieghbor. Than what the hell did I pay for!&#63;!&#63;!
                
                   She is a good teacher, and she is very nice. If you want to get A in this class, you should take MISY 2305 first and participate frequently in the class.
                
                   The way she approached math was like a lecture class. She would give you about 2-5 handouts every class in the form of a packet and then read through everything.  I guess the only good thing about her class was that she didn't give homework.This was just a job to her. Take Ms.Venson instead...she is so much better at explaning math.
                
                   Very nice teacher. Very willing to work with students that have disabilities and need extra time on tests. I never needed to do the homework, but it would be helpful if math isn't your strong suit. She has reviews before every test and posts the answers, including how she worked it out, on her website. Definitely recommend her for math.
                
                   Awesome instructor! Great notes. Expects a lot from her students, which is great! Very organized!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Wonderful teacher, very knowledable. Wonderful notes on her website, chapter and test reviews. Often spent individual time helping students during lab, office hours, and was extremly helpful with advice on how to get help for the labs.
                
                   Wonderful teacher, very knowledable. Wonderful notes on her website, chapter and test reviews. Often spent individual time helping students during lab, office hours, and was extremly helpful with advice on how to get help for the labs.
                
                   Great teacher.  Really knows her stuff.  Any student that complains about the size or number of labs is someone who needs to change his or her major before proceeding any further in a degree in this field.  Just wait untill you take COBOL.
                
                   Good teacher.  Very clear in teaching.  Sometimes she can be a bit condescending if you ask a question.  The main problem with this class was the amount of labs and the length.  Many of us had time finishing!  A challenging lab is good, but we need time!
                
                   Dr. Garcia is hands down one of the best professors at TAMUCC. He is one of the very few who actually cares about you, not as another student ID but as a person. I would recommend him to anyone -- even if you aren't a CS student, his classes are fun & actually relevant. Take him!
                
                   He is a good professor. His exams are difficult though. Make sure you study well for the exams! He likes Dragon Age.
                
                   He was pretty intelligent...but was not the best at teaching..but was clear and fluent...Who ever commented him about him in class COSC2301...he never taught that class...
                
                   Very knowledgible...corteous...
                
                   he is very good proff
                
                   No Comments
                
                   The worst professor I ever had. He can barely speak english.
                
                   Google is your best friend
                
                   This being my second class with Dr. Kar, I have to say that he's not exactly easy but not hard in the least since. He's also very generous when it comes to grades (ie: 85+ = A or top 5 students get As). You just really have to work to be one of those top students (coming to class, doing the hw, etc.). Study the powerpoints & you should be fine.
                
                   The book is not helpful at all and neither are his lectures. But you can get an A if you have an 85. If you skip a test he doesn't do make-ups. Tests get harder and Google is your best friend for the homework.
                
                   Distributed Networking and Processing
                
                   She's skillful at her trade and it shows in her lectures. She makes it interesting to learn about GIS. There's not any homework except some 1 page essay's due twice a month. However, her exams are no joke, so get ready to study. She like participation and is very approachable if needed. And when it comes to having the textbook, I never used it.
                
                   she does not post powerpoint slides online. How are we supposed to learn them for our exam including the graphs that are on there. She gives us outlines but are useless cause it comes from her PP. Waste of money and time taking her class. 
                
                   Great teacher, and super helpful. She keeps students involved and grabs your attention.
                
                   Seneca is probably the best professor i've had at A&M. I was required to take the class and she made it interesting. You can tell she honestly cares about her students. Would definitely take her again.
                
                   DAMN GOOOOOD
                
                   Wonderful professor, very clear presentation of material and her expectations of the class were straight-forward. Very easy to talk to and helpful when asked questions. Lots of vocabulary for the course I took, and the labs were time consuming.
                
                   you need to work hard. he depends on TA for test reviewing which so bad. class is good. smart teacher
                
                   He is one of the best professor. His classes are not easy but he helps a lot and If you want to get an A, you have to proof him your knowledge and show him you work hard.
                
                   Though it is hard, I would like to say it is a perfect class with perfect professor.
                
                   I agree with the person before me. The class is pretty hard but if you study, do the labs, and pay attention in class its pretty hard to fail.
                
                   He's far from easy, and he expects you to learn alot on your own, which is standard for upper division courses.  However, it's very difficult to fail one of Dr. King's classes.  As long as you try hard, and speak with him when you're stuck, you'll at least pass.
                
                   Great professor, very laid back and non-traditional.  Mostly lecture style, don't really need a book.  He's very smart and gives very little daily/home work.  Highly recommended!
                
                   she is so helpful, i took a nite class with her that only met once a week, she will answer any questions you have, the only thing that sucks is that she's running back and forth all over the classroom helping people so that you have to sit and wait til she gets to you
                
                   This is a teacher&#63;  Right.
                
                   Great professor, she understood what it meant to be a student and gave slack where it was needed but didn't just give away answers. 
                
                   She grades very well! Has a fun lecture!
                
                   Mr. Young helped me a lot and he is a good teacher for this hard subject. He goes out of his way to help you learn and undderstand. Also he is very effective 1 on 1 in his office. Very bright man who likes his job.
                
                   He doesn't really tell you what's on the test and lecture isn't very helpful. I tend to use the book and google a lot more. He's pretty flexible on changing dates on assignments. You never know you're grade in the class because he's always behind
                
                   Tough class, but the professor is fairly nice and willing to help out whenever you ask for it. But, he's kinda weird. He contradicts himself by saying you can pass the class without the book yet he assigns problems from the book. Makes strange noises at times (nerdy laughter). And, he looks like he hasn't seen the light of day in ages or something.
                
                   Definitely not an easy class nor an easy subject learn.  He is a very difficult professor and his labs can get very tedious, but he is always willing to help.  Anyone going into his class be prepared and you better study
                
                   Architecture.  Uses IJVM and expects you to be automatically fluent in it.  I suppose he's approachable, but he's always making comments about the 'A' students as if you're clearly not one.  Wait for someone else.
                
                   Professor Young is not an easy teacher by far.  This class is very tedious and time consuming.  But he is always willing to help  those who ask and is very into what he teaches.  Those who have this class better brace yourself.
                
                   The class itself was pretty tough. The lectures where not very helpful. If you like self taught style the class wasn't so bad. Also he gave a pretty healthy curve at the end.
                
                   Takes Unscheduled quizzes.
                
                   Decent Prof.
                
                   Very helpful professor. I would say best professor in the department.
                
                   Good communicator in class. Easy to understand his examples.
                
                   She is one of the best professors/teacher I had in my carrer
                
                   Awesome Professor, Extremely Helpful.
                
                   Homeworks are easy as long as you ask for help, if you are lost, then you better ask for help, dont buy the text book, study what she asks for the review and you will get an A.
                
                   Ridiculous grading policies, assignments, and tests.  Does not go over much in class that is on tests.  He and his TA's come off as smug and superior anytime a question is asked.  Unrealistic expectations for a 1000 level course.
                
                   Terrible teacher. Grading policies are ridiculous. He puts artificial roadblocks in his grading policy to keep the class average artificially low. He's one of only two teachers in computer science, Dr Alex is much better.
                
                   The worst teacher I've ever had. When I first came into the Computer Science program he wasn't as bad as he is now, but the signs were still there. Expects you to know stuff he doesn't go over in class, doesn't use the assigned textbooks, has unrealistic expectations, and IS IMPOSSIBLE TO COMMUNICATE WITH. Never replies to emails. AVOID IF POSSIBLE
                
                   Do the work. Read your text. Study outside of class. These are expected and if you don't do them... Go study something lame like cis.
                
                   Not a class for people who are not willing to learn. Paying attention is a must and if you don't you will fall behind. He throws a lot at you, but there is also a tremendous amount to learn.
                
                   Tough class, much of the learning is self learned. If you are interested it's an A, if you aren't it's gonna be tough.
                
                   You can learn alot here, granted you are willing.  If you can make it here, you won't make it in the real world as a programmer...you make it here, you will likely make it far.  don't plan on an A either.
                
                   He knows his stuff, but can't teach worth a darn. Hardly ever uses the textbook, but expects you to know the tiniest detail out of it. Could never get any real help with problems, so I just quit asking. Avoid Haiduk if at all possible!
                
                   He may know the subject, but he just doesn't teach it well. We didn't use a textbook in this class, either; everything was presented through PowerPoint slides, which happened to be pretty inadequate as they lacked a lot of fundamental info. This made the homework and tests way too difficult. Avoid Haiduk and take classes with Alex if possible.
                
                   wtf&#63; This guy can ramble about absolutely nothing, and then use pre-built quizes to test us over things we never covered!! Avoid if at all possible!!
                
                   Stupid people will hate him because he doesn't teach to a High School level audience.  If you want a class to sleep through, do not take a class with Dr. Haiduk.  OTOH, if you want to learn how to program well, Dr. Haiduk is an excellent teacher.
                
                   This is a teacher that acts like he is above you and  how dear a low life like you come and ask for his help. He knows his stuff but how dare you take his class without know everything about it before you take it. Test are very hard too.
                
                   Numerical Analysis - Your whole grade is writing programs using numerical methods to solve problems.  Grading is very lenient as long as you make a decent attempt at writing a program that employs the given method.  If you are a math major you have the option to work the problem on paper( which is harder In my opinion) instead of writing a program.
                
                   Not an overly easy class, but at the end of the semester you will have learned something.  Very willing to help during his office hours.  Test material comes straight from the lectures.  All tests are take-home tests.
                
                   He rambles; most of the time it has nothing to do with the lecture. He does not teach very well and it doesn't help that sometimes you cannot understand what he says. The homework and projects he give out sometimes have nothing to do with the reading or lectures; so you have to figure it out yourself and hope it is close to what he wants.
                
                   You better ask questions if you do not understand.  He loves when you go to his office to receive help. If you go ask for help, he will explain the right answer to you. You only have 3 tests and several homework grades that make up your final grade. TAKE NOTES and print the homework answers; you can use them on the test
                
                   The professor is very knowledgeable in what he teaches. The classes may drag on for some students, however.
                
                   His classes are usually very interesting, and he is especially knowledgeable about the application in neural networks.  He is also very helpful if you meet with him in person. 
                
                   Dr CruzCano is one of the most interesting proffessors i have ever had, great quality in teaching. He come from a very family smart family, i think he said his dad was a teacher.
                
                   Teaches completely from notes that are handed out at the beginning of the semester.  Very clear and never gets tired of answering questions.  Will go out of his way to make sure that everyone in the class understands what is being taught and is prepared for the tests.  
                
                   He is pretty straight forward, has alot of assignments to do but if you keep up and not fall behind you will do fine. 
                
                   Great guy,  hard topic.  Too Laid back for such a topic
                
                   I took this class in the summer and if you attend class you will receive all instructions needed to do well in the class. his grading system is very fair. He is very approachable and is there to help you. I would take him again.
                
                   If you attend class you will receive all instructions needed to do well in the class. his grading system is very fair. He is very approachable and is there to help you. I would take him again.
                
                   I took him for the summer course and Assignments are not 100% clear and he doesn't keep his word. It's a summer course and his folder week 13 it's a lot of work I mean a lot and he says he is going to cut some assignments  and instead be adds more. I ad 3 assignment, 1 group project, 12 quizzes, & 11 SAP course work all in 5 weeks try to avoid him
                
                   Great professor, wish woul have taken more of her clases!
                
                   Loved Prof Hewitt! I took her online class. Very accomdating and sincere! Will answer all your emails promptly. High recommended!
                
                   GREAT TEACHER AND HE HELPFUL. HER QUIZZES ARE TOUGH BUT THE CLASS IS WORTH IT
                
                   Read the materials, use the test study guides and get a team that wants to do well and that communicates on the project is helpful. Tests can be tricky but know the terms and concepts well and you will be fine.
                
                   This was the first semester this instructor taught this course.  She worked through problems with us and really helped to explain the course content.  Test's were moderate, if you study the notes.  Overall a great instructor.
                
                   I thought that she was great!  I definatly learned quite a bit in her class.  Lots of power points and some projects for whichever class she teaches.  Do the work and go over the test study guides and you will pass.
                
                   very boring unless your a computer wizard. lectures were just the professor reading off the powerpoint slides with no excitement or any additional comments for the exception of past jobs she had. Project can be very confusing. Be prepared when you take this class.
                
                   It helps to have a laptop for this course.
                
                   Very knowledgeable on security. Attendance is checked, classes are easy. Mostly theory with a bit hands on. Exams are online and make sure you are crystal clear on essay requirement. Grades hard on essay. Grading on Presentations are comical.
                
                   hard to understand at first, but after a few class sessions I was able to get accustomed to his thick accent.
                
                   Very heavy accent, to the point of missing (perhaps) 50% of the lecture. Not recommended
                
                   Great professor!  Genuinely cares about the success of his students.  The only difficulty is that sometimes it's hard to understand him because of his thick accent.  He understands most Grad students are employed full time.  So, he is flexible with the assignments due dates.  Highly recommended!
                
                   Read the material, and the tests are easy.  Extends due dates on work due.
                
                   Dr. Li did everything he could to help in the course.  All assignment's due dates were extended if we needed more time.  Test's were hard if you don't know the material, but he was very generous with the grading.  He is really good at teaching programming languages.
                
                   Great instructor.  I learned a lot!  A little hard to understand sometimes, but that's why you have a book also.
                
                   Dr. Li is very nice and bends over backwards for his students.  The lectures however follow the textbook almost exactly, which can make the lectures drag.  Easy to pass if you do your work ontime.
                
                   This teacher is ok, its just extremely hard to understand his accent (when teaching code, he often says &quot;header file&quot; and all I ever hear is ****)!  If the material wasn't so difficult I think the classes would be less stressful.
                
                   Good luck understanding him. Very unorganized and does not clearly inform you of exam dates. 
                
                   Missed several classes it did not hinder me at all. The class was easy, listen and follow directions the first time, you will have no issues. I'm taking another of his classes. Test were online and super easy.  Gives extra credit and gave lots of people 2nd chances to turn in late work. Not sure why he was rates so low. Doesn't check attendance.
                
                   Horrible exams, never have I had to wonder so much how I did and I was always surprised at the stuff I got wrong.  Tricky stupid duh I knew that stuff.  Rest of homework was ok, not a problem, just a LOT of it.
                
                   This class was a mess. He is not very helpful. You basically have to figure everything out on your own. He gets frustrated when you do ask questions, never gives you a clear answer. He also gives you a ton of work. He does have a lot of knowledge in this field, but doesn't know how to teach it. 
                
                   This class was a mess to say the least. Do not take his class unless you want to do all the work yourself. He is rude and unorganized and just hope you never need help. Very disappointed I was so excited for this class.
                
                   Gives a lot of assignments with little explanations. Expected to just "figure it out". Other than that, class was interesting. Professor has vast knowledge in his line of work. 
                
                   This introductory course was at the right point for non-majors, but still had some rigorous activities to allow us to learn about computers and technology. He was a new professor but was clear on discussing the subjects. There were quizzes from the book with exams over these. Also, we had to learn four programs from the Microsoft Office Suite.
                
                   The instructor was young and just graduated covering a course so students would be able to take it. He was confusing at times but would be very helpful in one on one sessions. A majority of the class shouldn't of been in Advanced programming when they were having trouble with basic logic and syntax. He seem to try his best with what he had.
                
                   Professor was new but was very helpful to students. A large problem was most students did not get the correct basic programming beforehand and expected high school level of work for a Bachelor's degree. Several of the peers seemed to need to change their majors but think just having the degree will make them worthwhile in the industry.
                
                   Not sure what they were thinking when they hired this "professor". He could not teach and he was very confusing. When he tried to show us how to program he would get confused on which programming language he was teaching and say "well you know", no that's why we were taking that class. I had to teach VB to myself and accept help from classmates.
                
                    I will used the applications learned in this class in my everyday life and my business practices. Professor Brown is a great professor. He responds quickly to your questions should you have any, although he does take a while to grade. All assignments are manageable. 12 Homework assignments and 14 Discussion Boards, and 1 Exam. 
                
                   Great teacher, very funny and easy going. He takes a little while to grade assignments but it is worth the wait. Highly recommend!
                
                   This class was great! The teacher is funny, engaging and attentive. He was very understanding if students did not understand the concepts and would spend an extra class answering questions. Must do the work and pay attention in class but you learn a lot!
                
                   Great professor, takes her time to make sure her lectures are understood, practicals can be challenging at times specially if you dont attend her class. Very informative and patient with students who cant grasp the material, definitely recommend her classes.
                
                   Learned a lot of computer terms in this class. Lots of computer examples that related to different jobs.
                
                   
                
                   Dr. Chennamaneni is highly supportive. She offered to instruct a class I needed to graduate even though she has a busy schedule. I am impressed with her work ethic and eagerness to assist students.
                
                   Highly recommended, would take her again. Lots of writing: 2 case studies, 4 discussion posts, team paper, individual paper, 2 exams. Grades fair, work load manageable.
                
                   The professor is very nice and probably would have helped me if I would have asked.  If you are a computer wiz and are passionate about systems, this class is for you.  I couldn't wait for this class to be over.
                
                   Class work is not to demanding, but you need to read syllabus to ensure you do all the work that is expected of you. If you need help just ask and she is willing to work with you. Grades fair. Good class to take online.
                
                   She is hard to understand and I have her for database.  But she knows her stuff, and if you are willing to put forth effort she will help you.   Remember she is the Department Chair, so she is short on time and does not have the same amount other proffs have.  Over all take her only if you have a good understand of the topics she teaches
                
                   Dr. Chennamaneni is the only teacher I've ever had who is not as concerned with teaching the concepts and building a base of knowledge. Her lecture style is based around a lot of exercises from the book. Her evaluation of the work and effort is inconsistent and does not inspire a desire to achieve a higher understanding of the material.
                
                   Dr. Chennamaneni is truly the only graduate level professor at this university who knows the material. She worked outside the academic field and has experience in what she teaches. Her courses are challenging, but you'll learn much more from her than any of the other professors.
                
                   I've had Dr. Ferdi for 2 classes. He was very nice and helpful. He's from Turkey so sometimes it's hard to understand him. But he's a good teacher and makes sure his students understand his lectures. There are 2 midterms and 1 final. Sometime he will let you take them home. You may have a group project but that's it. Definitely recommend!
                
                   Reads slides that she gives you.  Might as well take this class online because all she does is read the slides.
                
                   Class was not difficult as long as you used PowerPoints to study for chapter exams and use chapter exam question bank to study for Midterm and Final. She is very nice but is unclear on some directions, ask lots of questions to clarify all assignments.
                
                   Great lectures! Pay attention to his lectures and take notes; some test questions come straight from his lectures. His assignments are also based on his lecture. Read the discussion boards-he sometimes gives extra credit in there. Questions on assignments? Ask him and he will help! Kumquats are never the right answer!
                
                   Gr8 professor. Have taken 3 of his classes. ALL A's!  Not easy, depending on the subject, but he definitely introduces subject matter clearly and deeply enough, along with several examples usually.  Answers questions.  Explains issues found within homework and tests graded!   HIGHLY recommended!  I'd take more classes from him anytime! Oh, COOKIES!
                
                   The class was great! He is a very well organized online professor. He provides his online classes with video lectures that don't make you feel like you have to self-teach the class to yourself. He has weekly homework that correspond to the video lectures. The class is not "easy", but it will definitely teach you about web-design if you do the work!
                
                   His class was very very boring. He never returned any graded work. He provided cryptic clues when you asked for clarification on assignements.
                
                   Dr. Larson is extremely boring.My problem with his teaching style is the fact that he keeps students guessing.He never posted our grades and would deflect every time we would ask to see our results.How can we keep track of progress that way&#63;I will not take courses with him in the future if I can help it.
                
                   Hands down the best undergraduate professor at the university! Spent a lot of time with me in his office when I needed help and almost always had the answer to any of the questions from his students. I thought I knew a lot about C++ before, but this class and Mr. Mahlke taught me more than I ever thought I would have.
                
                   should not be behind the podium.  Cannot teach.  When asked questions she will not answer.  Show up for class and get an A.
                
                   The class was totally self taught. No lectures. She checked roll and that was it. The mid-term review was on chapters 1-5 and the test was suppose to be on chapters 1-5 and but when she brought it in it was on chapter 8 (macros)!!!!. We complained and got to either take the test home or write at research paper.
                
                   Not a very interesting class and not well organized.
                
                   All eight phases of system development are being taught in this class even though the course description says that at the &quot;junior level&quot; only the first four phases will be taught
                
                   The best Professor there period!
                
                   Dr. Villarreal is a very nice and helpful teacher! In his VB class you'll have about 12-14 chapters worth of assignments to do. Class lectures are very boring but the work is easy. You'll have a midterm and final which are take home. Just do the work and you will pass. I definitely recommend!
                
                   Dr. Villarreal was very nice. If you need help just go to his office, and he'll help. The lectures are a bit boring but the class was not hard at all. I'm taking him again next semester for Management Information Systems. :-)
                
                   Quizzes for each chapter, tests... all of which are open book. Reviews provided for all test. Additional assignments geared to the use of Microsoft office. The assignments are extremely helpful (not easy, but not too complicated) for general office use and future coursework. Definitely recommend. 
                
                   I had Dr. Vert recently.  He posts all assignments at the beginning of the semester so there is plenty of time to work on them. He allows students to contribute to review questions for the exams.  He is available in the labs. As with previous posts, this is a student oriented professor that works hard.  I'd take him again. 
                
                   Best professor at TAMU-CT. Would recommend other students to take Dr. Vert
                
                   I've had this professor for a few classes. He is one of the better ones. He teaches a lot about security and IT
                
                   One of the BEST professors at TAMUCT.  He follows his syllabus, has guidelines of exactly how the assignments need to be done, provides help if you have questions, and teaches you how his class will help you in the business world and in the future... Take his courses if possible!
                
                   Excellent class. As a team lead I can use this knowledge very well in my day to day job. The professor is an excellent teacher. His teaching methods are superb. Thanks! Prof. Greg.
                
                   Dr. Vert's main focus is on preparing students to succeed in the workplace.  He asks a lot but it lends itself well to getting the most out of the class.  He is fair in his expectations.  His class is perfect for the student that doesn't mind the challenge of thinking critically, and the payoff is real-world capabilities in the security realm.
                
                   Dr Vert has high expectations which forces his students to learn the material and develop their own thoughts. As a Graduate student, this is vitally important to be able to generate your own conclusions.
                
                   This class will make you work, but you will learn a lot in the process.  He is fair and reasonable and will work with you when issues arise. If you don't understand something, he's willing to take the time to help you get a handle on it. This class provided me with a good idea of the work that would be involved in pursuing a career in security.
                
                   Dr. Vert has been one of the great professor at Texas A&M Central Texas. If students just follow what he asks them to you, the students will learn a lot from him. I would recommend students to take his classes
                
                   CIS 486. The content of the was the most interesting of my CIS courses. The cirricuum ciuld have been better developed, but all-in-all it was good research.
                
                   I took this class from Prof. Vert last semester. It is an excellent class. I have learned a lot about viruses, spam and security. Now I am thinking of applying to security companies like McAffee, Trend Micro and others. This class gave me such a good insight about the threats that I never knew existed. Prof. Vert is a great teacher.
                
                   486 was a tough course where we were asked to work on exercises that were challenging because they were not spoon fed. I liked the course a lot, it was challenging, but it does require some thinking out of the box.
                
                   This course was fun and challenging. We had a lot of work to do from lectures to labs. I think the only two areas that he lacks in the most are the guidelines to assignments and being persistent with the deadlines to these assignments. Otherwise, he is still a good professor and I would recommend him to anyone!
                
                   First course of this type.  We did good hand on labs.  Hope we did detail and higher level of labs.  We actually learn at leat one chapter well; I'm not saying I didn't learn other chapters.  Lot of work to do.
                
                   Took the maiden course for Advance Oracle with Dr. Vert. He Walked us through installation of Oracle Databases and got us to create course slides and labs from scratch.
                
                   This is now Texas A&M University Central Texas Campus. This class Advanced Oracle.  We learned alot in class. He is a great Porf. It is a challangeing class but once you leave, you have learned alot, and your will know and be able to apply it in the work field. very flexible w/ assignments that need more time, he will extend the due date if needed
                
                   Dr. Vert expects alot from his students!!!!  Be prepared to work!!!!
                
                   Dr. Vert's class taught with the real world in mind. He doesn't focus on just theory but gets you prepared for a real working environment
                
                   This was a new class. He did a great job with hands on activities. This was an independent study class so there were nights where we ran the class ourselves. This was not an easy class but after understanding it became easier.
                
                   I've had 4+ classes with Dr. Vert. His classes are very helpful. For classes the students do research about the class & how it will help with jobs. The 2 poor posts are by the same person note the identical words. VBox had issues but he didnt know about it, we failed to let him know. Challenging class but great. Overall this is a great professor.
                
                   A very easy easy A. You never have to attend class. I always did the work at home. As long as you go along with the book you can't go wrong. You have to do a paper and a presentation but it isn't hard at all. I would definitely recommend this teacher!!!
                
                   I have great respect for this teacher, unlike most of the other CIS teachers. You could tell that he knew what he was talking about and absolutely loved sharing with us. Highly recommended instructor. Now, if only the Masters level classes could steal him away and replace Larson :(
                
                   I am still taking this class. he is really good to explain his lessons. the way he explain c++ seen so simple.
                
                   Dave is a great instructor. He instructed numerous classes that I took at TSU-CT.
                
                   Very good instructor.  One of the better ones that I have taken
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Course expectations were very clear - if you read the syllabus and complete the assignments you are able to make a good grade.
                
                   This class was taken online and there was very little help from the professor to understand the concepts presented. You had to teach yourself. The deadlines were not clear in Blackboard and you had to continually refer back to the syllabus. I am changing my degree plan after taking this course&I work in networking! Should take in class if possible!
                
                   Dr. Woodcock is a talker. He doesn't prepare for any of his classes. He goes off course during his lectures talking about previous jobs. I wouldn't recommend him simply because he's adamant about making sure everyone knows that majority of the students in his class will fail. I find studying material from online is more helpful than his lectures.
                
                   Wings programs.  Most of the time they don't work.  For this class he winged the class and didn't explain what exactly he wanted for the project.  Read slides the entire semester. I have had him for a lot of classes(chances are you can't get away from him, just be aware).  Tests are not from lecture and confusing.
                
                   I had him for both 511 and 516. He's not too specific in his assignments, but make an honest attempt and it should be well received. He is a talker with plenty of examples and if you listen there is no reason you shouldn't pass his short answer exams. Ultimately, I thought he was great and will try  to take more classes with him.
                
                   He did a great job but fell behind on grading because he was trying to get published. Does't really provide clear feedback in certain areas.
                
                   I took this professor for several classes and enjoyed every one.  He was willing to take the time outside of class to help with issues that arose. He is very knowledgeable and I tended to try to schedule my classes so I could take a class I needed taught by him instead of other professors.
                
                   The class is not easy, but it is not the professor' s fault.  He tries his best to make students understand the materials, well prepared for the lecture, and interact with students well in the lecture.  Taking his class for a year and his other lectures were also helpful.
                
                   He is one of the best computer since teacher i had
                
                   Interesting classes. I really liked that all the assignments for the whole semester where mapped out & ready early in the semester. I had the chance to work on the assignments as I learned the material. And funny!
                
                   Heard a lot of bad things about him, but wanted to try him out first. Definitely would avoid this professor at all costs. He seems like he knows about some old school programming, but wouldn't be able to navigate through Windows 7 to save his life.
                
                   Very helpful and friendly. Her exams were essay questions. You must answer them the way books states the answer or she will not give you credit. Do not write the answers in your own words.  Don't pass the exams, don't pass the class. 8 page report as a grade, with a smaller font then APA. Database classes can be a bit boring.
                
                   Great professor! Very helpful and no surprises as long as you pay attention. Very willing to review and explain details of material as long as the student is proactive. Would most definitely take her classes if opportunity came up.
                
                   Instructor provides review but does not go over it. Then you wonder why you don't do good in your exams. This are just theory classes, don't expect to do much hands on.
                
                   fantastic all-around
                
                   I took Dr. Green for IRM, Design, and Systems Analysis... she's a pretty groovy cat.  Sometimes boring but always super nice and helpful.  Tests are easy, just gotta study exactly what she tells you to.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Besides it being a video conference class, it was ok.
                
                   It was impossible to follow this man in class. He spent little time teaching. The 2nd half of the semester he spent hocking his anti-plagiarism software to COLLEGE STUDENTS. He's very out of touch like most of the prof's and teachers that TX A&M @ Texarkana inherited from ETSU  years back. Mothership needs to clean house! -source: local IT Pro.
                
                   This class is required for the MBA degree, and it's a complete joke. The entire course is graded based upon a group project (50%) of final grade, and weekly chapter quizzes (50%) of final grade. The quizzes are impossible to prepare for because there is so much reading to do. Professor McDonald doesn't teach anything. He is a terrible professor.
                
                   This was a complete waste of time.  He was the only teacher and the class was mandatory.  Save your money. Stay away if possible.
                
                   Took the class online.  The book is all that was needed to do well on both quizzes and exams.
                
                   The course was supposed to be about emerging technology...turns out, this professor should have thought about going into Freshman Comp instead. The entire course consists of students writing papers with no assistance and no apparent REAL rubric (other than no plagiarism tolerated...a good thing...and word count).
                
                   NOT WILLING TO HELP STUDENTS.  NOT WILLING TO HELP STUDENTS.  NOT WILLING TO HELP STUDENTS.  NOT WILLING TO HELP STUDENTS.  HE'S TERRIBLE!  I CAN'T BELIEVE A GREAT SCHOOL LIKE A&M WOULD HAVE THIS MAN STILL TEACHING THERE!  HIS WIFE IS COOL THOUGH!!
                
                   If I had not been working in the computer field, there is no way that I could have passed this INTRO course. The test is all about his excerts and his unique definitions. I have rarely had a professor that I considered to be so out of touch with his subject as Charles McDonald. The best thing that he did during the course was hide in his office.
                
                   This guy and his wife are the two worst professors I have ever encountered at three different Universities.  Their rules are ambiguous and grading is done by an unavilable computer program.  The class is suppose to be about emerging technologies, but it is really about the McDonald writing style.
                
                   Not a good instructor. He teaches computer classes but is unwilling to learn anything new and still teaches BASIC. Blames everyone else but himself.
                
                   COLD HEARTED; NOT A GOOD TEACHER; NO PERSONALLITY; HE'S DIFFERENT
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Uses slide shows to teach the class and you have to copy the slides for your notes. He reviews basically tell you to read all the chapters she has covered.
                
                   Attendance help your grade. Tests were online so wasnt to bad. great teacher
                
                   Mgmt Info Sys. Class is entirely lecture and recall. Covers PPTs from textbook. Attendence is helpful and part of your grade. He usually gives review sheets before exams. Not a hard class at all if you read the book.
                
                   Read the text and use the online supplements to study and you will do fine in this course. No homework, just unit exams. Non-comprehensive final. Class group project was the hardest part of this course. Hate group projects.
                
                   fairly easy class just study the vocabulary and you will make an A. Oh yeah and he loves telling bad jokes!
                
                   easy class took with 18 hrs.  I got a B but he curves unfortanetly for me room was full of Cisa majors.  All multiple choice from vocabulary words.
                
                   Class is absolutely pointless on attending, only if you want the extra credit points.  You will not miss a single thing by not attending this class. All he does is go through powerpoints that are available to you and makes the corniest jokes you can think of. I didnt even buy the book, should get a B outta this course!
                
                   Worthless course.  This so-called professor doesn't know anything about computers.
                
                   pretty easy. he does give out quizzes almost every class. the majority of the time he does NOT give out the answers. just go to every class, do your h.w. and study the study guide he gives and you'll do fine.
                
                   a very nice teacher. makes sure that everyone understands. if you do your homework and keep up with the class, you should do just fine.
                
                   Very easy class. Always gives pop-quizes but gives you the answers to them. An easy A if you turn in your h.w and do study guides for tests. Always gives you a 36 pt. curve on his test as well. End of final test is super easy!
                
                   she's the best Professor in our department
                
                   Easy to do well in his class.  Simple assignments.  The class is lame, but Lemaster is good professor.  Gives plenty of extra credit.  Tests aren't too demanding but cover the information taught very well.
                
                   Enjoyed his class. makes class more interesting and easy with lots of information. If you pay attention in his lecture and come to the test review , you can easily get A or B . I would recommend taking his class. he sometimes give extra points too...
                
                   He is a new guy in the department. His classes are very interesting and lectures are very clear and helpful. I will take any class with him. 
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He will lose your assignments and he hates to help you out!! On top of that his TEST SUCK!! He talks about how the real world is. However, he's late to class EVERYTIME (15 minutes or MORE) he totally SUCKS!! DO not take HIM!!!!!
                
                   This guy is a nice guy all around but he has a bad tendency of talking about stuff that has nothing to do with the subject. He turns a 15 minute lecture into a boring 1 hour lecture. He's pretty easy but be aware that he goes off subject alot. Do not take a night class with him. You will be there for the entire 3 hours.
                
                   Experienced guy.  Organized course.  Just do the assignments and you'll learn the topic.  It was a hands-on/practical class that will help me in my job probably as much or more than any of the other crappy courses in this major.  Altough this one was good, if you're just starting the program or thinking about it, go elsewhere.
                
                   This is a very tough professor.  He will allow you a time frame to submit projects and you must submit them within a timely manner.  If you will take his class, do not be lazy!  Seriously.  make-ups do not exist.  But keep communication open and he'll do what he can to help you.
                
                   This was the most informative and helpful course I've had at TAMUK.  It's not the easiest class, but as long as you do the assignments, you can and will get an A.  I like the hands-on approach.  This guy shows projects he's done in the real world, and although it's not always exciting, he knows his topic.
                
                   this professor blows. he expects students to come into class already understanding what hes talking about. his lecture is redundant and boring. save your $500 and pick another class.
                
                   You need to sit in the front and pay attention, because she moves through instructions quickly.  There aren't any tests, but there are in-class assignments every week and a project at the end of the semester.
                
                   She will help you if you do the work. Recommended.
                
                   I knew nothing about programming coming into this class and I have learned so much. It was a hard course but the teach was amazing.
                
                   Amazing instructor, too bad shes retiring after next semester. One of the few teachers that I sure will miss but always remember ^_^
                
                   This professor inspired me greatly, she's an extremely amazing teacher, and I would take every class she teaches before she retires if you get the chance, no other professor cares about their students success like she does
                
                   I took her for both 1435 and 1436, she's a GREAT professor! Anytime you needed help her door was always open. If she knows you are working hard she'll let you know otherwise she'll let you know to think about a different direction. Taking her would be a very wise decision.
                
                   Really cares and does her best to make you learn. Her tests are beyond hard but it prepares you for later.
                
                   Perfect teacher for course. You will be prepared for later courses.
                
                   Highly recommend.  Take her if you can get her.  Just study for the tests, because they are really hard.
                
                   She is an awesome Teacher!!!  Really good at explaining difficult subject matter.  Actually one of the best teachers I had there at A&M.  Would definitely reccomend her!!
                
                   Great professor and very smart, but very demanding and a challenging course.  She will help you out a lot, but you do have a bunch of work and studing to do!
                
                   Interested in her students learning the material.  She's no pushover, but she is very fair.  If you have the drive to succeed in her class, she will definately help you get there.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is one of the best professor I have ever seen. He explains everything clearly. If you do not understand something, he can spent more than one hour to explain what you do not understand. In the class, If he says something straight forward that means it is really hard but he always helps you.
                
                   He is a genius, but not on teaching.
                
                   He does not prepare you for future classes. He knows his stuff but assumes you know it too....in an intro class. He spoke about read/write to file and had us just copy his code into ours and didn't tell us how to do it. Left me totally unprepared for 1436. Still not a difficult class to pass though...you just arent prepared for the future classes.
                
                   Not the best Professor. Mainly he teaches graduate level classes, so he does not relate well with intro students. Hes going to talk about stuff that doesn't relate to the lab, if so its only about 1%.
                
                   Probably one of the worst instructors I have ever endured, his instructions on assignments were unclear and expectations were unrealistic. He literally seemed to get pleasure from students struggling to excel in this class. 
                
                   Excellent professor.  One of the best I've had at TAMUCC.  A little tough at times, but very understanding and smart about computers!  I would deffinantly recommend taking him!
                
                   superb..................professor
                
                   software engineering - Awesome teacher!!  I actually learned in his class and he doesn't resent you if you don't do well on a test.  Such a nice guy and always willing to help.
                
                   One of the best professors I had. He is so enthusiastic and clear. A+ quality!
                
                   Dr. Mahdy in an excellent professor and TAMUCC is lucky to have him.  The knowledge and expertise he brings to his classes enhance the learning experience.  His focus on learning concepts first, then drilling down as time permits, keeps the focus of the class clear.  To many other classes emphasize regurgitating details.
                
                   Mahdy cares about the students and their education.  He is willing to go over the same topic numerous times until every student understands the concepts.
                
                   OUTSTANDING!! I highly recommend him.
                
                   A+ professor. He cares a lot about the class and students. Very friendly, made the class a very good experience
                
                   I learned a lot in that class. The best graduate course I had until now. He made it fun attending this class. I really appreciate his sincere way of teaching and caring about students. His lecture was always full of thinking and learning.
                
                   He is the best professor I have ever seen period. I would love to take any of his classes. He RULEZ!
                
                   He's a  very nice man and is easily approachable, but his accent makes it difficult to understand him.  He takes his times with grades, with the exception of the exams.  Study the chapter review questions for the exams.
                
                   A bit hard to understand and always behind with grades, but he's approachable. He goes through everything thoroughly, and is flexible on deadlines. He's very patient, really wants his students to understand what he's talking about, and won't make anything excessively hard. Exam questions are based on in-class exercises. One of the better CS profs..
                
                   It's hard to understand him and he takes random attendance. He never hands back homework and you can't keep your tests. He is easy but you can't get behind.
                
                   Excellent teacher
                
                   Great teacher. His English is a little rough but once you learn his accent he's fantastic. He's highly intelligent and is able to break complex topics down into simpler forms so that you can learn them, absolutely great at teaching.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Cant Speak English!!!  Horrible Notes.  Cant follow.  You learn more from his Lab Techs then you do from him.  Its supposed to be for beginners, there is no way you can go in there knowing nothing and pass that course.  TeSTS ARE HARD!!!
                
                   Easy class, however i doubt that it prepares you at all for Data Structures.  Teaching style isn't really in depth and doesn't get into details.  You have to learn a lot on your own in order to finish labs.
                
                   Dr. Katangur is very interested in teaching. Not just getting paid. He has no problem halting a class so that he can make sure that everyone understands the concepts before moving on. Lenient on dates if you are working hard and gives excellent reviews for his tests. Would/Will recommend.
                
                   Operating Systems is not an easy class, but Katangur makes it somewhat better. He is pretty funny if you like sarcasm. The labs are MURDEROUS -- start on them early & get help prior to the due date. Tests are OK if you study PowerPoints. He curves too, so just try to stay on top of class. As a teacher I'd give him 4/5 on easiness but class is 2/5.
                
                   I would never recommend this professor to anyone. He is darn near impossible to understand, and I goes through the course work way too fast. Unless you already know how to do comuter programming do not take a class taught by him. He also gets pissed at the slightest noise and feels to need to tell the entire class to not do it.
                
                   Great professor. Even though he has a thick accent, I understood him compeletly. He is very helpful, and willing to explain and answer every question you ask him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   While he is sometimes difficult to understand due to a thick accent, he is a very good instructor.  Very helpful at answering questions to help you understand something.
                
                   Programming for Engineers: Self-Taught, Books is mandatory to get info for HW. This is a two part class, you'll need two different books. The teacher has a strong accent and is sometimes difficult to understand. teaches off slides that only overview what you'll be doing on the homework.  Expect to spend alot of time teaching yourself this class.
                
                   He likes to make a lot of analogies and kinda has a weird stutter. labs are so easy.
                
                   I couldn't find anything interesting to study in his class. Also, It seems like he is not understanding clearly what he is teaching. So funny!
                
                   He is such a well-respected professor. If you do your work and learn the material, you should be just fine. 
                
                   Brilliant, brilliant teacher.  As long as you show up to class actually wanting to get something out of it, this guy's going to get you to where you want to be, and will be absolutely sure of it. His tests aren't necessarily hard, but they do require you to really learn what he's been teaching, so you'll have to have a basic understanding.
                
                   To date my favorite computer science professor. He is very honest, and will help as long as you make the effort. He provides the reading material for you in his Blackboard so pay attention! If you attend class and pay attention in lab, you will definitely be on the right track to mastering computer science
                
                   Very cool guy. He's turkish, and does have an accent, but is still very easy to understand. One of my favorite professors this semester. Reading is not optional, and neither is programming. You must have a very good understanding of the material to pass, and he'll do whatever it takes to get you there. He loves people who ask questions in his class
                
                   The class would have been a great experience if I were a programmer but sadly I am not. Make sure to do all your hw. The test are the most difficult thing about the class. He wants the answers in a very particular way. Sometimes you will have to speak with him about minor details of the test and receive credit back.
                
                   One of the coolest CS professors at TAMU-CC. He is very approachable and he wants everyone to enjoy his lectures. The labs are not hard at all, just pay attention to the instructions and you will do just fine. Exams get easier by the end. I don't see any reason why someone can't make an A in this class. I really enjoyed taking DS with him.
                
                   Awesome instructor. Very clear and entertaining. Sometimes took a long time to return grades so I never knew how I was doing in the class...but, overall a great professor...
                
                   Computer Graphics
                
                   Cutshall is probably one of the most laid back funniest professors at TAMUCC. DO NOT MISS CLASS. You'll miss the examples which are VERY helpful. His class isn't too hard just as long as you practice the examples like he says. If you're looking for a blow off and skip class a lot, you won't pass. But he is super helpful and understanding. 
                
                   No homework except the final semester project, which was easy and not time consuming at all as one would think. Tests are easy. You may have to study for the first few but, rest of them were open book. He does curve the grades if everyone scores low, and other times just because he feels like it. Would consider taking him again for another class.
                
                   I loved the class. I had another professor for the same course and dropped the class to take it with Cutshall. He provides many examples and is very helpful. I have a similar sense of humor so I found him to be funny.  If I hadn't already taken the other classes that he teaches I would have taken him. 
                
                   I would say that this class is a class you want to attend every single day. I consider him a great teacher because he takes his time to walk through several examples and steps through out the whole course. One of the better professors in my opinion if I had the choice to take him for another class I would.
                
                   I have taken all of the classes he teaches ,ORMS had unexpected difficult point distrb., he offered only two exams and attendance , had to deal with his weird jokes for all of those classes,in other 2 MISY clases he was screaming to get atention of the class everybody was on facebook explains a lot ,feel sorry for MIS majors the're no alt. prof
                
                   I had Dr. Cutshall for Computer App in Business, and he's an awesome guy. His class is just one Excel project at a time, and he goes over everything with the class, even the exams and what will be on them. He'll totally stop class to help someone if they're having trouble. I would definitely take him again. His jokes are awesome, you'll do well.
                
                   Hard class, he has "practice problems" online for every chaper but you dont have to turn them in. However dont expect to pass if you dont do them or go to class. He is a very good teacher and answers any questions you have. Kinda corney but it makes it to where the class isnt boring. Over all I would recommend him.
                
                   Gives two drop grades but doesn't allow you to turn anything in late. Really monotone but still thought he was hilarious. All the assignments we're the same thing every week, it got very boring and repetitive. His class is necessary for business majors but if you can get a different professor, I would.
                
                   He's a good teacher, very helpful but only if you ask! He likes to yell at random times I guess just to get everyones attention after you get over the initial shock its kind of funny. Make sure you go to class every day, ask questions, and do your homework and you'll do great!
                
                   It was a difficult class, but Dr. Cutshall was true to his office hours and would help as much as it took. Just be prepared with your questions. Very good prof, who taught a difficult subject in "real world" terms. Go to class, follow his steps, do your homework and you will get an A.
                
                   Very hard class. He is very knowledgeable at what he does but not a great teacher and rude. His test are not multiple choice so be prepared.
                
                   Took him over a month to agree to meet with me to discuss my grade.  Wouldn't even respond to my email for weeks.
                
                   
                
                   Very intelligent professor that explains things in &quot;real world&quot; terms.  Show up and pay attention, you'll be fine!
                
                   Good professor, very smart, but very demanding also.  Requires a lot of outside work to keep up, but you should be able to get an A if you do everything he asks.
                
                   I recommend studying well for the tests as they are 75% of your grade. Her reviews before are pretty helpful (ask questions!!). Labs are just a pain with all the nitpicking that occurs. Still I think if you show some effort, she's OKAY.
                
                   Easiest computer science teacher you can get! I recommend taking her, especially if you only need one or two of the computer science classes for your degree. I tried this class with Larry Young and had to drop it, but it was a breeze with Busch. She takes her time with the notes, is very helpful during lab time and is super nice. Awesome teacher!
                
                   The class is generally pretty easy if you have will to learn. Labs are probably the worst part (though not THAT hard) because she can be picky about the appearance of the code. Tests aren't that hard--follow the SG and go over the labs & it's pretty much straight from there. Just keep up with it & stay for the labs so you can get help there.
                
                   u better study class is too hard....good teacher definitely recommended
                
                   
                
                   Excellent instructor.  He comes from industry so his classes are geared to prepare you for that.  His assignments and tests are demanding but very relevant.  His grading is very reasonable.  Don't take his classes is you want to just show up and get an A.  Participation is very important.  You will learn a lot and be better prepared for a real job.
                
                   Very fun class. I learned a lot and utilize this information in a lot of environments that I am in.
                
                   Class are straight forward and easy to understand. He's very helpful and there are always people there to help if you are stuck. I recommend taking him.
                
                   Excellent class and professor.
                
                   
                
                   he is extremely helpful
                
                   He is a great professor without any doubt. This class could help students to find job in big compnay like Microsoft, Sun and Cisco Systems.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Provided printed copies of the extensive notes on the subjects covered. The printed notes practically act as the textbook for the course. Very professional, great lectures, awesome professor.
                
                   Dr. Saffer is the best! Best professor I have ever had! He's extremely helpful and will make sure you understand the material. If you do not pass it is simply because you do not try.
                
                   Very unprofessional.  Berated and humiliated me in front of the entire class after misreading one of my written answers (he mistook an "A" for  "4").   Even after he realized that he was mistaken and my answer was correct, continued to berate me on this and subsequent occasions.  Really seemed to have it in for me.  Avoid if at all possible!
                
                   One of the best Compu Science professors I have ever had. I am horrible at programming, but I was able to pass with his help. If you try, and let him know you are trying you will benefit greatly. He is overly helpful, and his notes rock.
                
                   Best teachers at this university, makes notes so crystal clear that if you end up bieng sick just look at the note handouts and youll be caught up again. The only reason you cant pass his class is if you dont pay attention
                
                   One of the best professor which i have met in my life. His teachings are pretty good.
                
                   Saffer is one of the most helpful teachers i have taken. I took this class in Fall 2011. He allowed test retakes for the whole class, and if needed he would go over the material for you again during class or in his office.
                
                   This teacher is the one to get for only one reason, he provides class notes and only teachers from those so you don't need any books! He basically spoon feeds his material until everyone gets it. You have to speak up if you don't get the work or it will literally leave you behind in the dust. He's got a pretty dry humor but class isn't bad at all.
                
                   I took 241 about 10 years ago.  I'm auditing now because 516 taught me NOTHING.  I actually need Assembly since some projects where I work still use it.  Dr. Saffer is nice enough to let me sit in on his class so I can actually learn Assembly, whereas in 516 with Sirakov, all you learn is how to memorize other students past tests and quizzes.
                
                   Dr. Saffer teaches fine the first time, but doesn't get it when his material passes over the student's heads. He believes you should get the information on the first try.
                
                   Dr. Saffer has a good reputation with computer science majors.  His dry wit was a welcome addition to an often dry subject.  I found the class interesting and informative, relating to aspects of the computer field I had not yet been exposed to.  The lecture manual was concise.
                
                   It was a very interesting class and I feel that his teaching of the class has given me a better understanding of computers and concepts.
                
                   Dr.Saffer is an asset to the computer science department!He works with his students and cares.  Don't be freaked out by his semi-dry teaching method, he teaches a boring subject!Also Dr. Saffer helps out the students by letting low turn out classes make.
                
                   Good teacher, a bit unusual but that can be good.
                
                   Dr. Saffer is a good teacher. He knows his stuff and he will teach you it. If you don't understand the first time, he will help you uderstand the second time. HIGHLY Recommend!
                
                   Very good teacher. I understood every point he made and if I didnt he knew how to put it to where I could understand him. I found his sense of humor hilarious and would take another class but thats all he teaches
                
                   he looks like freddy krueger...  i do like his lectures.
                
                   I enjoy a dry sense of humor and he definitely has one.  I found that Assembler was not that hard and I took it during the summer (5 week course)
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he is scary,,,,
                
                   he is really good 
                
                   By far the best professor I've had in my entire collegiate career.  Course objectives are clearly stated and met.  She'll keep your attention and make the material very interesting.  Don't slack off though - she's tough.  A very effective teacher - I highly recommend.
                
                   Easy A as long as she likes you.  I was lucky because I fit her ideal... many did not.  She has no clue as to the real world... every class I had from her was a total waste of time.  You cannot avoid her if you are a CSCI major so kiss up from day 1.  Extra-curricular reading and studying is advised if you want to compete out of the gate after grad
                
                   This lady ROCKS!
                
                   Plays favorites.
                
                   Interesting having her for ethics in Computer Science.
                
                   Material is difficult and time-consuming, but she guides you through it with persistance.  Creating software from the ground up is hard, but she tells you exactly what she wants and how she wants it.  GREAT teacher who will give you the grade you deserve!
                
                   awesome instructor. difficult class to teach, as she must rate each within each group. she is extremely fair and impartial, gives chances, and fails those who deserve it.  she critiques with a fine tooth comb which is real-world, just what students need.
                
                   She was a fantastic teacher.  I had a medical emergency in her class and she was very willing to help me get caught up and very understanding.  She made C++ fairly easy to learn (not good with programming period).
                
                   USELESS professor! Practically illiterate, the assignments are a mess, does not communicate with classes in a clear manner, and stupid grading system. By far the worst professor I have EVER had.
                
                   If you want to learn anything about VB .NET programming DO NOT take this class with Hodges. He is ignorant of the subject and on top of that...he is crazy.
                
                   Went out of his way to help me during one of the worse semesters that I ever had.  His help extended to my personal life which was affecting my school life.
                
                   Nice guy but crazy as a loon. Does not know Visual Basic. Why is he teaching this class&#63;
                
                   Wonderful Professor and mentor. Makes being in class enjoyable and worthy. NOT a bore. lol I recommend he teach more classes. He definitely offers a change of pace and had GREAT attitude!
                
                   Best Prof. at A&M-C. Great guy, nice, funny, makes computer science fun! I didn't know that could be done till I met Bobby Earl.
                
                   crazy
                
                   Very good teacher.  Seems to be somewhat ADHD - but it keeps one's attention.  Very funny!!!
                
                   What a great guy!! I haven't had him as a teacher, but he's full of helpful information and if he doesn't know the answer, he finds out for me!! Thanks a bunch!!
                
                   Very Interesting! The guy simply know's what he is doing.  Helps students be prosporus.  We need more guys like him here at A&M-Commerce.
                
                   Carbon Copy of Jim Carrey.Makes computer programming fun.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Cool guy, an equal opportunity heckler.  Seems a bit hung up on the old ways of doing things.  For instance, I'm not convinced that COBOL is nearly as versatile as, say c++ or java.  But overall a good teacher and I would recommend the class to others.
                
                   I like Robert Hodges He makes learning and not a lecture.  I feel he treats all his students fairly, and rayes each student on their performance and how much effort they put into class. He brings a sense of  The Real World  into the classroom. Cool guy!
                
                   lectures basically tell us what to read.  It would be more helpful to actually do the code and show how it works more.
                
                   Best I have had at Commerce
                
                   The professor thaught this class unprofessionally. He messed with the quizez, the grades, He never helped in an issue in the class. He ignores students problems, promises to answer by a time frame and not answer at all.  It was a headache professor. If you have a chance to take someone else, do nat take him. 
                
                   One of the best teachers in the Computer Science department. He brings slides to every class which he teaches off of. There are pop quizzes that he warns you of prior to giving them. All the tests and quizzes are based off the slides. If you study his slides and listen to his lectures you will make an A.
                
                   Great grasp on his topic and the current state of research. Extremely high quality work in class and research-wise, while maintaining a happy, enthusiastic environment in the classroom and lab. Would highly recommend (know you stuff though, he can't stand idiots, alto he is polite).
                
                   Attendance was the only grade so it was an easy A, but Dr. Schaefer is really awesome and made me sure of my decision to pursue computer science.
                
                   Attendance only grade in the class, can miss one of the lectures and still receive an A. Class ENDS HALFWAY THROUGH THE SEMESTER. Funny and engaging lectures.
                
                   This class has no exams or assignments. Your grade is solely based on attendance.  Schaefer's lectures taught me a lot about what you can do with computer science.  Some of the guest lecturers put me to sleep, but Schaefer's lectures are very engaging.
                
                   This is the easiest class to attend. I love all the lectures they really showed me why I should keep pursuing computer science. Grading is 100% attendance, but you could miss one class and still pass. If you wanted to miss more you just attended seminars that where held all thorough the semester. Highly recommended to take. 
                
                   Attendance was required, it was the only grade. But he allowed you to make up missed days by going to seminars held all semester. If you missed one class you still made an A. 
                
                   LOVE DR. SCHAEFER! He's a great presenter and uses entertaining graphics to explain concepts. He helped me become more interested in computer science.
                
                   This lecture course was literally 100% attendance and didn't even last the whole semester. You could miss two classes and still get an A, but the lectures were actually super interesting. The guest lectures were hit or miss but when Dr. Schaefer lectured it was always awesome.  You learned a TON about CSCE and Dr. Schaefer made it fun and easy.
                
                   Took Data Structures and Algorithms with Dr. Schaefer as an honors course and absolutely loved him. The class was fun, the material was engaging, and the programming assignments were very sensible and do-able (not overwhelming). Going to class is so very helpful and class time flies by. Lots of examples and in-class exercises. Not difficult exams. 
                
                   Ritchey is a computer science engineer, so he is really big on online assignments and not so big on explaining them. If you already have experience coding and making programs this class will be easy for you! If you don't, you'll really have to seek out help. Might as well rename this class GROUP PROJECTS 111 so get ready to work outside of class.
                
                   He's a good guy until you realize he's ruining your grade. His tests are significantly harder than any other teacher (our class average was about a 70 while the rest was about a 90) and he grades mercilessly. He also assigns much more homework than any other professor. If I could change one thing about this semester, it would be this class.
                
                   Very nice professor, very helpful and very good at teaching the material.  Only caveat on my part is that I wasn't fully expecting Comp Sci for non-majors to fully go into things like classes for python, and this ended up being pretty difficult, but he taught us well and accommodated for the difficulty with easy extra credit and a curve.
                
                   He has a heavy accent so difficult to understand. Read the book because he doesn't go over a lot of the syntax or he'll be lax about it. His tests are too long and very tricky. He curves. Boring. Writes out examples in class. Extends homework deadline if a lot of people are having trouble. Usually late to class. Doesn't cover some topics very well.
                
                   tough
                
                   Not a fun professor, expects a lot and not good at explaining material
                
                   This teacher sucks, had to change the grading scale so that 80 was an A
                
                   Extremely intelligent and knowledgeable, but the monotone lectures and slow presentation can put you to sleep.
                
                   I took his class but I was not impressed.  On the positive side he was motivated but even after much effort teaching the class he still came up short.
                
                   Very knowledgeable, hope he had the magic wand to pour the knowledge to the students as well.
                
                   Class is a little tough. I got an A by memorizing the powerpoints and not using the book at all. I also used tests from previous semesters and they were helpful. Take advantage of the fact that the lab is 25% of the class grade, you should get a 95% average in the lab. He says that an a is usually an 89 or so and above. Attendance is 5% of grade.
                
                   Attendance is 5% of your grade so I would really recommend showing up to every class, it's a free 5 points. Lectures are okay but I highly recommend you read the book, it was my best friend in this class. Tests are hard but he curves according to classes.
                
                   He cares about your grade and if you take the time to go talk to him, he is very clear on how to do well in the class. If you dont read the textbook or are not familiar with programming then you're going to be ill-prepared for the exams.
                
                   As a CSCE major, I've been exposed to coding before, so class was fairly easy, but if you haven't coded ever in your life, expect this class to be hard. His lectures explain code, but sometimes he can be very confusing. It's a lot of theory as well as coding. His tests are hard and sometimes confusing. He is willing to help always and curves.
                
                   Hes a great professor, but his test are difficult and kind of tricky. I studied for a test for forever then would be confused by a twist he would put on the question. He curves according to the class average. I missed a test for a club sports game and he let me make it up the next class, not a big deal. Attendance is 5% of the grade!
                
                   Hurley and his TA are great.  His lecture was pretty boring because you learn mostly from reading the text book.  In class, he goes through code and explains it, which is pretty helpful.  You will learn a lot through the lab assignments.  His tests can be tricky, so read carefully.
                
                   He's a very good teacher, but he's not always clear. You absolutely have to read for this class. Also, his tests are not easy at all, and sometimes they can be worded in the weirdest ways. READ AHEAD!
                
                   Really great professor with a love of computer science that sparked my personal interest in the field. If he ever teaches again, take his course. It may be slightly challenging but his course definitely prepared me more than most other students in higher level computing courses.
                
                   The class is pretty straight forward. You do labs and take tests. The labs can take a while and the tests are moderately hard. He is pretty funny, but will call you out if you are clearly not paying attention.
                
                   Tests consist of almost all trick questions. Read each question carefully. Test questions are directly from the book. He is not very good at explaining things.
                
                   He's tough but fair.  Don't expect too much sympathy.
                
                   I didn't kow anything about CS and left strongly interested. He gives all slides and takes test questions from them. Read the book. Do not sleep, he will stop lecturing and call you out. The assignments are fairly easy and TAs help alot.
                
                   He isn't a professor that you would go talk to at office hours. He isn't the greatest at explaining well anything but he does make sure you understand the material before the test. If you read the chapters and print the notes you are golden. Super easy class.
                
                   Took a class from Hurley 10+ yrs ago. I have earned an MS, an MBA, and a JD since my days in CPSC 110. Yet after 320+ hours of College credit, he is still the rudest unpersonable professor I have ever had.
                
                   Pretty easy, makes things pretty clear, asks before class if there are any questions over reading, last lecture, etc... He can be pretty funny too. Tests can be tricky, read and practice the code in the book. One thing though, he can be cocky sometimes when answering questions. But thats just because he knows his stuff.
                
                   Good, helpful professor, but doesn't realize students don't have the time for fifty problem homework. She's a nice teacher, but doesn't know how to teach undergrad courses. First test was so long, nobody could finish it.
                
                   One of the best profs in the University. His reputation as one of the most difficult is well earned - but you will learn something AND enjoy class.
                
                   Will hold you hostage with an I for semsters to come
                
                   Dr. Gooch is a very unique professor. He basically gives you the code and it's up to you to improve it. There was no exams given in the class, your grades come from weekly discussion/lab quizzes and exercises. This class was very easy though I recommend you take someone else if you want  a challenge. It's really up to you to learn how to code.
                
                   He was amazing. Very funny guy and he gave you every resource you needed to become a better coder. His lectures aren't super important but he's very nice and will help you with anything!
                
                   Easiest class ever. Our grade was based only on homework and weekly "Skill & Drill" quizzes. Quizzes are 10 questions pulled from a pool of about 80 questions. For homework he just gives you a code and all you have to do is change it to "make it cooler" and submit it and you're done! Piece of cake! Lectures are pointless but hilarious.
                
                   He is by far the most laid back professor I have ever met.  He is absolutely hilarious and if you are bored in his lectures feel free to just play game, he won't mind.  Though to learn from him, you must be willing to teach yourself outside of class.  His assignments are crazy easy, so it's  best to do more than you have to to learn!
                
                   Dr. Gooch is really great! Easy, fun class and great professor.
                
                   Avoid, does not teach what he puts on his tests.  There is no transparency into how you received the grade you did and you do not know at any given time in the semester where you stand.  You could think you are getting an A and end up with a C, or you could think you are getting a C and be surprised with an A.  Horrible professor!
                
                   Like everyone said, his tests are impossible to study for. Everything is a trick question that could trip up a C++ veteran. 
                
                   Excellent professor, very engaging lectures. Suggest you read the material that will be covered in lecture beforehand. Tests are impossible to study for, but do your best. Workload is perfectly fine, not stressful, unless for the group project you're assigned to a bunch of peons. Has clicker quizzes so SOMETIMES attendance is mandatory.
                
                   Daugherity is a really cool guy, but the workload and the tests are nigh impossible. There are assignments every week in lab, but they are doable if you ask for help from the peer teachers and Daugherity. The lectures are boring. The tests are what kill you though, they are long and come directly from the book, lectures don't prepare you at all.
                
                   Horribly boring class, but fairly easy. I never went to class because his lectures put me to sleep and I still got an A. Do the homework. 
                
                   He is very dedicated and helpful and will make sure that you understand the coursework.
                
                   He is a cool guy who has excellent command over the subject.
                
                   Teaches at a graduate class level
                
                   Awesome Professor !! He exactly knows how to not let a student sleep and make him learn concepts in a simple and easy way. He has got a great sense of humor !
                
                   He is an amazing professor. Very smart and have sense of humor in the class. Enjoyed homeworks and the final project.
                
                   Was fooled into thinking he's a 'cool' prof who he teaches well...in most classes he just keeps talking about his wife and kids and his vacation plans.. teaches very little actual content. controls 50% of your grades in the name of project and class participation, I felt that the final grades were given in an extremely shady way.Beware of Caverlee!
                
                   Taking CIDM 3330 online and his structure of the class is just overall confusing. So many different documents to read and try to decipher what he actually wants you to do. Dropped class early in the semester to focus on other classes, don't have time for this unorganized crap.
                
                   I am vivid hater of group projects but this class has many of them. BUT they were not too bad. I was able to get a great group to work with for the most part. The first few weeks has busy work but it slows down toward the end. He gives plenty of examples and videos of what he expects. As long as you do the work, you shouldn't fail. 
                
                   No textbook except for $20 (new) book on how to be a responsible person. The book will be used when creating webpages. Fun class if you want to learn how to make webpages. Very helpful instructor if you have any questions about assignments.
                